Massachusetts, session 194th, S530.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 28 of chapter 53 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following new paragraph:- The state secretary shall not place
on the presidential primary ballot the name of any candidate who has not, at least 60 days in
advance of the presidential primary date, made public and readily available the candidate’s
federal income tax returns, as defined in section 6103(b)(1) of the United States internal revenue
code, for the immediately previous four years. The state secretary may promulgate regulations to
implement this paragraph.
of 1